Nebraska, session 109, LB502.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB502 LB502
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 48-1714, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1714 (1) Any person who violates violating section 48-1711 or
48-1712 shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.
(2) Any person who (a) intentionally defaces, alters, or changes a
farm labor contractor license, (b) uses the license of another, (c)
knowingly permits the use of another person's license, or (d) acts as a
farm labor contractor without a license shall be guilty of a Class II
misdemeanor.
(3) Any seed corn producer or farm labor contractor who violates
section 48-1715 shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.
Sec. 2. Original section 48-1714, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-